District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.18

Confidentiality of information.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section or as otherwise required by law, the Department and the employees, agents, and contractors of the Departments shall not disclose:

(1)

The contents of a report or examination of a person by the Department, except as the Commissioner determines is appropriate to disclose in the final order issued under § 26-551.13;

(2)

Information furnished to, or obtained by, the Department, the disclosure of which the Commissioner determines could endanger the safety and soundness of a financial institution;

(3)

Personal financial information furnished to, or obtained by the Department, except as the Commissioner determines is appropriate to disclose in the final order issued under § 26-551.13.

(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the contents of a report or examination of a person or information, including personal information, furnished to or obtained by the Department may be disclosed:

(1)

To employees, agents, and contractors of the Department in the performance of the duties of the employee, agent, or contractor;

(2)

To the directors, officers, and other persons authorized by the board of directors of a financial institution or other entity, if the financial institution or other entity furnished the information to the Department;

(3)

To authorized and appropriate government agencies; or

(4)

In accordance with a court order.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 118, 48 DCR 3244

History